Florida, session 2026, HB343.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Insurance Solutions Advisory Council.—
(1) The Insurance Solutions Advisory Council, an advisory
council as defined in s. 20.03(7), Florida Statutes, is created
within the Office of Insurance Regulation to analyze and compile
available data and evaluate relevant and applicable information
relating to Florida's property and automobile insurance market.
The advisory council shall serve in an advisory capacity to the
office and the Legislature and, except as otherwise provided in
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb343-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 343 2026
this section, shall comply with the requirements of s. 20.052,
Florida Statutes.
(2) The advisory council shall be composed of the
following members:
(a) Three members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives:
1. One member representing a residential property and
casualty insurer that has issued at least 150,000 homeowner's
insurance policies in this state at the time of the creation of
the advisory council.
2. One member representing a surplus lines insurer.
3. One member who is a trial attorney.
(b) Three members appointed by the President of the
Senate:
1. One member representing a commercial nonresidential
property and casualty insurer.
2. One member representing a residential property and
casualty insurer that has issued fewer than 150,000 homeowner's
insurance policies in this state at the time of the creation of
the advisory council.
3. One member who is a public adjuster.
(c) Three members appointed by the Governor who are not
employed by or professionally affiliated with an insurance
company or a subsidiary of an insurance company, at least one of
whom must be a consumer advocate or a member of a consumer
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb343-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 343 2026
advocacy organization or agency and one of whom must be
recommended by the Florida Insurance Council. The Governor shall
appoint from among the three members the advisory council's
chair.
(d) Two members appointed by the Chief Financial Officer,
representing insurance agents in this state.
(e) One member representing Citizens Property Insurance
Corporation, selected by the chair of the board of governors of
the Citizens Property Insurance Corporation.
(f) The Commissioner of Insurance Regulation or his or her
designee.
(3) Members must be appointed no later than August 1,
2026. Members serve at the pleasure of the officer who appointed
them, and a vacancy on the advisory council must be filled in
the same manner as the original appointment. Members of the
advisory council shall serve without compensation but are
entitled to reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses
pursuant to s. 112.061, Florida Statutes.
(4) The advisory council shall meet at the call of the
chair at a time and location in this state designated by the
chair.
(5) The Office of Insurance Regulation shall provide
staffing and administrative assistance to the advisory council
in performing its duties.
(6) Beginning October 1, 2026, the advisory council shall
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb343-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 343 2026
submit an annual report regarding its analysis as specified in
subsection (1) and any recommendations related to property and
automobile insurance in this state.
(7) In accordance with s. 20.052(8), Florida Statutes,
this section is repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb343-00